Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.066

Appropriations to institutions of higher education—"Inflation" defined.

(1) Beginning with the 2015-2017 omnibus appropriations act, the legislature shall appropriate to the state board for community and technical colleges and to each of the four-year institutions of higher education an amount that is at least equal to the total state funds appropriated in the 2013-2015 biennium and the net revenue loss from resident undergraduate tuition operating fees based on budgeted full-time equivalent enrollment received for the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium under *RCW 28B.15.067 (3) and (6). The net revenue loss shall be adjusted for inflation in subsequent biennia.

(2) As used in this section and RCW 28B.15.069, "inflation" shall be based on the consumer price index, using the official current base, compiled by the bureau of labor statistics, United States department of labor for the state of Washington. If the bureau of labor statistics develops more than one consumer price index for areas within the state, the index covering the greatest number of people and covering areas exclusively within the boundaries of the state shall be used.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 36 s 2; 2003 c 232 s 3; 2000 c 152 s 2; 1999 c 309 s 932; 1995 1st sp.s. c 9 s 3; 1993 c 379 s 205.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28B.15.067 was amended by 2020 c 114 s 4, changing subsection (3) to subsection (2) and deleting subsection (6).

Short title—2015 3rd sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 28B.15.031.

Finding—Intent—2003 c 232: See note following RCW 28B.15.031.

Severability—Effective date—1999 c 309: See notes following RCW 41.06.152.

Intent—Purpose—Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 9: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1993 c 379: See notes following RCW 28B.10.029.